Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2435.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the EMS Dementia Care Training Act.Section 2. Purpose.The purpose of this act is to ensure minimum training requirements for EMS personnel in this Commonwealth to help them effectively interact with individuals who have Alzheimer's disease or other dementias.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:1234567891011121314151617 "Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth."Emergency medical services provider" or "EMS provider." Any of the following:(1) An emergency medical responder.(2) An emergency medical technician.(3) An advanced emergency medical technician.(4) A paramedic.(5) A prehospital registered nurse.(6) A prehospital physician extender.(7) A prehospital emergency medical services physician.(8) An individual prescribed by regulation of the department to provide specialized emergency medical services.Section 4. Training requirement.A certified first responder shall successfully complete basic and continued training on identifying and interacting with individuals with Alzheimer's or other dementias as part of EMS provider training or continuing EMS provider education.Section 5. Duty of department.The department shall develop and promulgate a dementia training program in cooperation with the Department of Aging. The program shall include instruction on identifying and interacting with individuals with Alzheimer's or other dementias, best practices on emergency medical care for them and identifying signs of elder abuse as part of basic training and continued education.Section 6. Duration of training.The program under section 5 shall require the following:(1) Initial training of three hours during the certification process for EMS personnel that includes:(i) dementia, psychiatric and behavioral symptoms, 20260HB2435PN3240 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and common medical emergencies experienced by individuals living with dementia;(ii) communication issues, including how to communicate respectfully and effectively with the individual who has dementia in order to determine the most appropriate response and effective communication techniques to enhance collaboration with caregivers;(iii) methods to address behavioral symptoms during the administration of emergency medical treatment;(iv) identification and reporting of incidents of abuse, neglect and exploitation;(v) protocols for contacting caregivers when an individual with dementia is found wandering or during emergency or crisis situations; and(vi) local caregiving resources that are available for individuals living with dementia.(2) Continuing education to include one hour of dementia training covering the subjects described in paragraph (1).Section 7. Noncompliance.An EMS provider who fails to successfully complete the approved dementia training in violation of this act shall be subject to rules and regulations established under 35 Pa.C.S. § 8121 (relating to certification sanctions).Section 8. Grandfather provisions.(a) Prior training.--An EMS provider who has successfully completed dementia training that meets the minimum criteria established by the department within 18 months prior to the effective date of this subsection shall be deemed to have satisfied the initial three-hour precertification training requirement and shall not be required to repeat the training as 20260HB2435PN3240 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a condition of certification or recertification.(b) Annual training.--An EMS provider described in subsection (a) remains subject to the continuing education requirement specified in section 6(2) and must complete one hour of dementia training annually.(c) Duty of department.--In evaluating eligibility under subsection (a), the department shall apply the minimum criteria retroactively to training completed within the 18 months prior to the effective date of this subsection and shall establish procedures for EMS providers to demonstrate eligibility, including acceptable forms of documentation evidencing prior training completion.Section 9. Relationship to other law.If another act enacted, or regulations promulgated, prior to the effective date of this section contain more rigorous training requirements, the act or regulations shall apply. Where there is overlap between these provisions and other law and regulations, the department shall interpret this act to avoid duplication of requirements while ensuring that the minimum requirements specified in this act are met.Section 10. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2435PN3240 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122